Utah statutes.
57-23-2.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Cooperative" means a form of coownership of real estate in which:

(a)  the fee interest in the real estate is held by a corporation, partnership, trust, or other legal entity;

(b)  an individual's interest in the cooperative is evidenced in a form such as stock, participation shares, membership certificates, or similar instrument; and

(c)  the participating individual's right of occupancy is demonstrated by a proprietary lease or similar instrument.

(2)  "Division" means the Division of Real Estate of the Department of Commerce.

